Utah statutes.
32A-12-206.   Unlawful sale or supply of beer.
(1)  A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise furnish or supply beer
to the general public in containers larger than two liters.  This does not
preclude licensed beer wholesalers from selling, offering to sell, or
otherwise furnishing or supplying beer in containers larger than two liters to
beer retailers authorized by this title to dispense beer on draft for
consumption on the beer retailer's licensed premises.
(2)  A person may not purchase or possess beer in containers larger than two
liters unless the person is a beer retailer authorized by this title to
dispense beer on draft for consumption on the beer retailer's licensed
premises.
